Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.710

Employee assistance program—Created.

The employee assistance program is hereby created to provide support and services to state employees who have personal problems that impair their performance in the workplace. The goal of the program is to help promote a safe, productive, and healthy state workforce by assisting state employees and their supervisors to identify and deal with such personal problems. However, nothing in this chapter relieves employees from the responsibility of performing their jobs in an acceptable manner.

[ 1990 c 60 s 302.]

NOTES:

Severability—Subheadings not law—1990 c 60: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.